Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
CHAPTER 402 Marriage

402.005.
Definition of marriage.

As used and recognized in the law of the Commonwealth, “marriage” refers only to the civil status, condition, or relation of one (1) man and one (1) woman united in law for life, for the discharge to each other and the community of the duties legally incumbent upon those whose association is founded on the distinction of sex.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 258, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes

On June 26, 2015, the United States Supreme Court in Obergefell v. Hodges, 192 L. Ed. 2d 609, held that the Fourteenth Amendment requires a State to license a marriage between two people of the same sex and to recognize a marriage between two people of the same sex when their marriage was lawfully licensed and performed out-of-State.